North Carolina statutes. Chapter 78C. Investment Advisers.
Article 8. Regulation of Athlete Agents. [Repealed]

§§ 78C-71 through 78C-81.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2003-375, s. 1, effective August 1, 2003.

Cross References.

As to present similar provisions, see

G.S. 78C-85

et seq.

§§ 78C-82 through 78C-84.

Reserved for future codification purposes.